Hawaii statutes.
[§46‑19.8] Fire sprinklers;
residences. [Section repealed June 30, 2017. L 2012, c 83, §3.]
No county shall require the installation or retrofitting of automatic fire
sprinklers or an automatic fire sprinkler system in:

(1) Any new or existing detached one- or two-family
dwelling unit in a structure used only for residential purposes; and

(2) Nonresidential agricultural and aquacultural
buildings and structures located outside an urban area;

provided that this section shall not apply to new
homes that require a variance from access road or firefighting water supply
requirements. [L 2012, c 83, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next